Illinois, session 104th, SB2459.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Meat and Poultry Inspection Act is amended 5by changing Section 2 and by adding Section 21 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 650/2)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 302)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Adulterated" means any carcass, part thereof, meat or 9meat food product, or poultry or poultry food product under 10one or more of the following circumstances:11        (1) if it bears or contains any poisonous or 12    deleterious substance which may render it injurious to 13    health; but in case the substance is not an added 14    substance, such article shall not be considered 15    adulterated under this clause if the quantity of such 16    substance in or on such article does not ordinarily render 17    it injurious to health;18        (2)(A) if it bears or contains (by reason of 19    administration of any substance to the live animal or 20    otherwise) any added poisonous or added deleterious 21    substance (other than one which is (i) a pesticide 22    chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; (ii) a 23    food additive; or (iii) a color additive) which may, in   SB2459 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1    the judgment of the Director, make such article unfit for 2    human food;3        (B) if it is, in whole or in part, a raw agricultural 4    commodity and such commodity bears or contains a pesticide 5    chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 6    346a of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;7        (C) if it bears or contains any food additive which is 8    unsafe within the meaning of Section 348 of the federal 9    Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;10        (D) if it bears or contains any color additive which 11    is unsafe within the meaning of Section 379e of the 12    federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act: Provided, That an 13    article which is not adulterated under clause (B), (C), or 14    (D) shall nevertheless be deemed adulterated if use of the 15    pesticide chemical, food additive, or color additive in or 16    on such article is prohibited by regulations of the 17    Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture 18    or under Section 13 or 16 of this Act;19        (3) if it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, 20    putrid, or decomposed substance or is for any other reason 21    unsound, unhealthful, unwholesome, or otherwise unfit for 22    human food;23        (4) if it has been prepared, packed, or held under 24    insanitary conditions whereby it may have become 25    contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been 26    rendered injurious to health;  SB2459 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1        (5) if it is, in whole or in part, the product of an 2    animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter;3        (6) if its container is composed, in whole or in part, 4    of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render 5    the contents injurious to health;6        (7) if it has been intentionally subjected to 7    radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in 8    conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect 9    pursuant to Section 348 of the federal Food, Drug, and 10    Cosmetic Act;11        (8) if any valuable constituent has been in whole or 12    in part omitted or abstracted therefrom; or if any 13    substance has been substituted, wholly or in part 14    therefor; or if damage or inferiority has been concealed 15    in any manner; or if any substance has been added thereto 16    or mixed or packed therewith so as to increase its bulk or 17    weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it 18    appear better or of greater value than it; or19        (9) if it is margarine containing animal fat and any 20    of the raw material used therein consisted in whole or in 21    part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance. 22    "Amenable" means foods containing 3% or more raw, or more 23than 2% cooked, red meat or poultry, other edible portions of 24carcass, or bird, or siluriformes fish, or products that 25historically have been considered by customers as products of 26the meat or poultry industry.   SB2459 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1    "Animals" means cattle, calves, American bison (buffalo), 2catalo, cattalo, sheep, swine, domestic deer, domestic elk, 3domestic antelope, domestic reindeer, ratites, water buffalo, 4and goats. 5    "Capable of use as human food" means the carcass of any 6animal or poultry, or part or product of a carcass of any 7animal or poultry, unless it is denatured to deter its use as 8human food or it is naturally inedible by humans.9    "Custom processing" means the cutting up, packaging, 10wrapping, storing, freezing, smoking, or curing of meat or 11poultry products as a service by an establishment for the 12owner or the agent of the owner of the meat or poultry products 13exclusively for use in the household of the owner and his or 14her nonpaying guests and employees or slaughtering with 15respect to live poultry purchased by the consumer at this 16establishment and processed by a custom plant operator in 17accordance with the consumer's instructions.18    "Custom slaughter" means the slaughtering, skinning, 19defeathering, eviscerating, cutting up, packaging, or wrapping 20of animals or poultry as a service by an establishment for the 21owner or the agent of the owner of the animals or poultry 22exclusively for use in the household of the owner and his or 23her nonpaying guests and employees.24    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture of the 25State of Illinois.26    "Director" means, unless otherwise provided, the Director   SB2459 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1of the Department of Agriculture of the State of Illinois or 2his or her duly appointed representative.3    "Establishment" means all premises where animals, poultry, 4or both, are slaughtered or otherwise prepared either for 5custom, resale, or retail for food purposes, meat or poultry 6canneries, sausage factories, smoking or curing operations, 7restaurants, grocery stores, brokerages, cold storage plants, 8processing plants, and similar places.9    "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act" means the Act 10approved June 25, 1938 (52 Stat. 1040), as now or hereafter 11amended.12    "Federal inspection" means the meat and poultry inspection 13service conducted by the United States Department of 14Agriculture by the authority of the Federal Meat Inspection 15Act and the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act.16    "Federal Meat Inspection Act" means the Act approved March 174, 1907 (34 Stat. 1260), as now or hereafter amended by the 18Wholesome Meat Act (81 Stat. 584), as now or hereafter 19amended.20    "Illinois inspected and condemned" means that the meat or 21poultry product so identified and marked is unhealthful, 22unwholesome, adulterated, or otherwise unfit for human food 23and shall be disposed of in the manner prescribed by the 24Department.25    "Illinois inspected and passed" means that the meat or 26poultry product so stamped and identified has been inspected   SB2459 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1and passed under the provisions of this Act and the rules and 2regulations pertaining thereto at the time of inspection and 3identification was found to be sound, clean, wholesome, and 4unadulterated.5    "Illinois retained" means that the meat or poultry product 6so identified is held for further clinical examination by a 7veterinary inspector to determine its disposal.8    "Immediate container" means any consumer package or any 9other container in which livestock products or poultry 10products, not consumer packaged, are packed.11    "Inspector" means any employee of the Department 12authorized by the Director to inspect animals and poultry or 13meat and poultry products.14    "Label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic 15matter upon any article or the immediate container, not 16including package liners, of any article.17    "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or 18graphic matter (i) upon any article or any of its containers or 19wrappers or (ii) accompanying the article.20    "Meat broker", "poultry broker", or "meat and poultry 21broker" means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the 22business of buying, negotiating for purchase of, handling or 23taking possession of, or selling meat or poultry products on 24commission or otherwise purchasing or selling of such articles 25other than for the person's own account in their original 26containers without changing the character of the products in   SB2459 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1any way. A broker shall not possess any processing equipment 2in his or her licensed facility.3    "Meat food product" means any product capable of use as 4human food that is made wholly or in part from any meat or 5other portion of the carcass of any cattle, sheep, swine, or 6goats, except products that contain meat or other portions of 7such carcasses only in a relatively small proportion or 8products that historically have not been considered by 9consumers as products of the meat food industry and that are 10exempted from definition as a meat food product by the 11Director under such conditions as the Director may prescribe 12to assure that the meat or other portions of such carcass 13contained in such product are not adulterated and that such 14products are not represented as meat food products. This term 15as applied to food products of equines or domestic deer shall 16have a meaning comparable to that provided in this definition 17with respect to cattle, sheep, swine, and goats.18    "Misbranded" means any carcass, part thereof, meat or meat 19food product, or poultry or poultry food product if: 20        (1) its labeling is false or misleading in any 21    particular; 22        (2) it is offered for sale under the name of another 23    food; 24        (3) it is an imitation of another food, unless its 25    label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the 26    word "imitation" followed immediately by the name of the   SB2459 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1    food imitated; 2        (4) its container is made, formed, or filled so as to 3    be misleading; 4        (5) it does not bear a label showing (i) the name and 5    place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or 6    distributor and (ii) an accurate statement of the quantity 7    of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical 8    count; however, reasonable variations in such statement of 9    quantity may be permitted; 10        (6) any word, statement, or other information required 11    by or under authority of this Act to appear on the label or 12    other labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such 13    conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, 14    designs, or devices in the labeling and in such terms as to 15    make the label likely to be read and understood by the 16    general public under customary conditions of purchase and 17    use; 18        (7) it purports to be or is represented as a food for 19    which a definition and standard of identity or composition 20    is prescribed in Sections 13 and 16 of this Act unless (i) 21    it conforms to such definition and standard and (ii) its 22    label bears the name of the food specified in the 23    definition and standard and, as required by such 24    regulations, the common names of optional ingredients 25    other than spices and flavoring present in such food; 26        (8) it purports to be or is represented as a food for   SB2459 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1    which a standard of fill of container is prescribed in 2    Section 13 of this Act and it falls below the applicable 3    standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless 4    its label bears, in such manner and form as such 5    regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such 6    standard; 7        (9) it is not subject to the provisions of paragraph 8    (7), unless its label bears (i) the common or usual name of 9    the food, if any, and (ii) if it is fabricated from 2 or 10    more ingredients, the common or usual name of each 11    ingredient, except that spices and flavorings may, when 12    authorized by standards or regulations adopted in or as 13    provided by Sections 13 and 16 of this Act, be designated 14    as spices and flavorings without naming each; 15        (10) it purports to be or is represented for special 16    dietary uses, unless its label bears such information 17    concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary 18    properties as determined by the Secretary of Agriculture 19    of the United States in order to fully inform purchasers 20    as to its value for such uses; 21        (11) it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, 22    artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it 23    bears labeling stating that fact or is exempt; or 24        (12) it fails to bear, directly thereon or on its 25    container, the inspection legend and unrestricted by any 26    of the foregoing provisions, such other information as   SB2459 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1    necessary to assure that it will not have false or 2    misleading labeling and that the public will be informed 3    of the manner of handling required to maintain the article 4    in a wholesome condition.5    "Official establishment" means any establishment as 6determined by the Director at which inspection of the 7slaughter of livestock or poultry or the preparation of 8livestock products or poultry products is maintained under the 9authority of this Act.10    "Official mark of inspection" means the official mark of 11inspection used to identify the status of any meat product or 12poultry product or animal under this Act as established by 13rule.14    Prior to the manufacture, a complete and accurate 15description and design of all the brands, legends, and symbols 16shall be submitted to the Director for approval as to 17compliance with this Act. Each brand or symbol that bears the 18official mark shall be delivered into the custody of the 19inspector in charge of the establishment and shall be used 20only under the supervision of a Department employee. When not 21in use, all such brands and symbols bearing the official mark 22of inspection shall be secured in a locked locker or 23compartment, the keys of which shall not leave the possession 24of Department employees.25    "Person" means any individual or entity, including, but 26not limited to, a sole proprietorship, partnership,   SB2459 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1corporation, cooperative, association, limited liability 2company, estate, or trust.3    "Pesticide chemical", "food additive", "color additive", 4and "raw agricultural commodity" have the same meanings for 5purposes of this Act as under the federal Food, Drug, and 6Cosmetic Act.7    "Poultry" means domesticated birds or rabbits, or both, 8dead or alive, capable of being used for human food.9    "Poultry products" means the carcasses or parts of 10carcasses of poultry produced entirely or in substantial part 11from such poultry, including but not limited to such products 12cooked, pressed, smoked, dried, pickled, frozen, or similarly 13processed.14    "Poultry Products Inspection Act" means the Act approved 15August 28, 1957 (71 Stat. 441), as now or hereafter amended by 16the Wholesome Poultry Products Act, approved August 18, 1968 17(82 Stat. 791), as now or hereafter amended.18    "Poultry Raiser" means any person who raises poultry, 19including rabbits, on his or her own farm or premises who does 20not qualify as a producer as defined under this Act.21    "Processor" means any person engaged in the business of 22preparing food from animals, including poultry, derived wholly 23or in part from livestock or poultry carcasses or parts or 24products of such carcasses.25    "Shipping container" means any container used or intended 26for use in packaging the product packed in an immediate   SB2459 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08840 AAS 18895 b1container.2    "Slaughterer" means an establishment where any or all of 3the following may be performed on animals or poultry: (i) 4stunning; (ii) bleeding; (iii) defeathering, dehairing, or 5skinning; (iv) eviscerating; or (v) preparing carcasses for 6chilling.7    "State inspection" means the meat and poultry inspection 8service conducted by the Department of Agriculture of the 9State of Illinois by the authority of this Act.10(Source: P.A. 100-843, eff. 8-14-18.) 11    (225 ILCS 650/21 new)12    Sec. 21. Wholesale distribution standard. All siluriformes 13fish or siluriformes fish products entering any official 14establishment intended for wholesale distribution shall be 15inspected, handled, stored, prepared, packaged, marked, and 16labeled as required by 9 CFR 530 through 9 CFR 561, which is 17hereby incorporated by reference. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.